Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.300

Annexation for municipal purposes.

Legislative bodies of code cities may by a majority vote annex territory outside the limits of such city whether contiguous or noncontiguous for any municipal purpose when such territory is owned by the city.

[ 1981 c 332 s 7; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.300.]